District of Columbia statutes.
5-432

Establishment of Fire and Emergency Medical Services Training Fund.

(a)

There is established a lapsing Fire and Emergency Medical Services Training Fund (“Fund”), which shall be separate from the General Fund of the District of Columbia. All fees generated under § 5-431(b) shall be deposited into the Fund, and any interest earned on these deposits shall be credited to the Fund.

(b)

The monies in the Fund shall be expended solely and exclusively to cover the costs directly associated with operating the Department’s training programs, and shall be used to acquire improved technology and equipment, to hire, train, and certify staff, and to otherwise improve the quality of the training programs offered by the Department.

(c)

Repealed.

(d)

Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting or limiting the allocation of additional funds from the revenues of the District of Columbia for the purposes designated in subsection (b) of this section.

Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 703, 50 DCR 5668
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9046, 58 DCR 6226

History

D.C. Law 19-21, in subsec. (a), substituted “lapsing” for “nonlapsing, revolving”; and repealed subsec. (c), which had read as follows: “(c) All monies deposited in the Fund shall be appropriated without fiscal year limitation pursuant to an act of Congress. Excluding monies collected in the current year, any money deposited in the Fund in the year prior to the current year and the interest earned on that money remaining in the Fund after the payment of the costs accrued in the prior year, less 10% of the remainder amount that shall be retained as a reserve operating balance, shall be transferred or revert to the General Fund of the District of Columbia.”

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 703 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 703 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).

Emergency Legislation